Louisiana, session 2026, SB110.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The introductory paragraph of R.S. 14:81.1(G) is hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 14:81.1(A)(3) and (4) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§81.1. Child sexual abuse materials
A.(1) * * *
(3) It shall also be a violation of this Section for a person to use an image
of a child under the age of seventeen years at the time the image was created
with the intent to train an artificial intelligence model to produce child sexual
abuse materials.
(4) It is not a required element of an offense under this Section that the
child depicted in the child sexual abuse materials be a natural person.
* * *
G. In prosecutions for violations of this Section, the trier of fact may
determine, utilizing the following factors, whether or not the a natural person
displayed or depicted in any photograph, videotape, film, or other video reproduction
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 110 ENROLLED
introduced in evidence was under the age of seventeen years at the time of filming
or recording, or whether or not the image used to train an artificial intelligence
model depicts a person who appears to be under the age of seventeen years:
(1) The general body growth, bone structure, and bone development of the
person.
(2) The development of pubic or body hair on the person.
(3) The development of the person's sexual organs.
(4) The context in which the person is placed or the age attributed to the
person in any accompanying video, printed, or text material.
(5) Available expert testimony and opinion as to the chronological age or
degree of physical or mental maturity or development of the person.
(6) Such other information, factors, and evidence available to the trier of fact
which the court determines is probative and reasonably reliable.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.